Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-120] Campus safety and
accountability. (a) The University of Hawaii shall:

(1) Train all University of Hawaii students and
employees, including security personnel, Title IX coordinators, and residential
advisors, on:

(A) Public Law 92-318, Title IX of the
federal Education Amendments of 1972, as amended;

(B) The Violence Against Women Act of 1994,
as amended; and

(C) University of Hawaii executive policies
on sexual harassment, sexual assault, domestic violence, dating violence, and
stalking;

(2) Provide all existing University of Hawaii employees
with the training described in paragraph (1) by July 1, 2017, and every two
years thereafter;

(3) Provide all new University of Hawaii employees
with the training described in paragraph (1) no later than thirty days after
the date of first employment;

(4) Provide all students with the training described
in paragraph (1) annually;

(5) At each campus of the University of Hawaii
system, designate a confidential advocate for students to confidentially
discuss incidents of, and obtain information on, sexual harassment, sexual
assault, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, and related issues;
provided that confidential advocates and communications received by
confidential advocates shall not be exempt from any otherwise applicable
mandatory reporting requirements for child and vulnerable adult neglect and
abuse as provided by chapters 346 and 350;

(6) Publicize the name, location, phone number, and e-mail
address of the confidential advocate on the website of each respective campus;

(7) Make available to students and employees written
and electronic materials and training programs concerning Title IX of the
Higher Education Amendments of 1972; the Violence Against Women Act of 1994;
and University of Hawaii policies concerning sexual harassment, sexual assault,
domestic violence, dating violence, and stalking; and

(8) Inform victims in writing of the right to file a
police report with the appropriate county police department for investigation
and assist victims in submitting the police report.

(b) All University of Hawaii faculty
members are designated as "responsible employees" under Public Law
92-318, Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972, as amended, and
shall report any violations of University of Hawaii executive policies
regarding sexual harassment, sexual assault, domestic violence, dating
violence, and stalking to the Title IX coordinator of the faculty member's
campus; provided that any faculty member designated as a confidential advocate
pursuant to subsection (a)(5) shall not be a "responsible employee";
provided further that the confidential advocate shall annually provide general
statistics to the Title IX coordinator about the number and type of incidents
received by the confidential advocate.

(c) All University of Hawaii students and
employees shall complete the training required under subsection (a)(1), (a)(2),
(a)(3), and (a)(4) or may be subject to fines, sanctions, or other discipline,
as deemed [appropriate] by the University of Hawaii.

(d) No later than March 31, 2017, and every
two years thereafter, the University of Hawaii shall conduct a campus climate
survey of all students. The University of Hawaii shall submit a report to the
legislature no later than twenty days before the convening of each regular
session that shall include:

(1) A summary of the most recent campus climate
survey results;

(2) Information on the number of sexual assaults that
occurred on a University of Hawaii system campus within the past five years;
and

(3) Recommendations and efforts to improve campus
safety and accountability.

(e) The University of Hawaii shall establish
policies and procedures to effectuate this section. [L 2016, c 208, §2]

Note

Revision of University of Hawaii executive policies, as
necessary, regarding student conduct, nondiscrimination, etc. no later than
December 31, 2016; memoranda of understanding with county police departments by
December 31, 2016, regarding sexual assaults on university system campuses. L
2016, c 208, §3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next